Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.006

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health or the secretary's designee.

(3) "Chiropractor" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(4) "Commission" means the Washington state chiropractic quality assurance commission.

(5) "Vertebral subluxation complex" means a functional defect or alteration of the biomechanical and physiological dynamics in a joint that may cause neuronal disturbances, with or without displacement detectable by X-ray. The effects of the vertebral subluxation complex may include, but are not limited to, any of the following: Fixation, hypomobility, hypermobility, periarticular muscle spasm, edema, or inflammation.

(6) "Articular dysfunction" means an alteration of the biomechanical and physiological dynamics of a joint of the axial or appendicular skeleton.

(7) "Musculoskeletal disorders" means abnormalities of the muscles, bones, and connective tissue.

(8) "Chiropractic differential diagnosis" means a diagnosis to determine the existence of a vertebral subluxation complex, articular dysfunction, or musculoskeletal disorder, and the appropriateness of chiropractic care or the need for referral to other health care providers.

(9) "Chiropractic adjustment" means chiropractic care of a vertebral subluxation complex, articular dysfunction, or musculoskeletal disorder. Such care includes manual or mechanical adjustment of any vertebral articulation and contiguous articulations beyond the normal passive physiological range of motion.

(10) "Extremity manipulation" means a corrective thrust or maneuver applied to a joint of the appendicular skeleton.

[ 2002 c 225 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 103; 1992 c 241 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 36; 1989 c 258 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—1992 c 241: See note following RCW 18.25.005.